Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska10-139
County treasurer or other officer holding funds; duties.

Any county treasurer or other officer holding any funds of an issuer shall transfer to the issuer or to a paying agent all or such portion of such funds as the governing body or treasurer of the issuer shall request. The county treasurer or officer making payment to the issuer or to a paying agent as requested shall have no further responsibility for the funds so transferred. Upon request, one payment shall be for the funds collected or received during the previous calendar month and shall be paid not later than the fifteenth of the following month. A second demand may be made prior to the fifteenth of the month on taxes and special assessments collected or received, during the first fifteen days of the month. The second demand shall be paid not later than the last day of the month.

Laws 1983, LB 421, § 6;

Laws 1998, LB 1104, § 3.